Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-472
Misbehavior of sentinel.

Any sentinel or lookout who is found drunk or sleeping upon his post, or leaves it before he is regularly relieved, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 72, p. 1579.